Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB279.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Council on Postsecondary Education shall:
(1) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
prohibit public funds from being allocated or expended, either directly or
indirectly, by or on behalf of a public postsecondary institution towards a degree
in a low-earning outcome program as described in 20 U.S.C. sec. 1087d(c). The
administrative regulations shall include:
(a) A list of funds subject to this prohibition, including:
1. Individual student financial aid;
2. Base operational or instructional funding;
3. Separately or specially appropriated aid or grants that are not
mandated programs as defined in KRS 164.092;
4. Capital or facilities funding; and
5. Performance-based funding; and
(b) A list of current degrees in low-earning outcome programs at public
postsecondary institutions;
(2) Annually review updated federal determinations of low-earning outcome
programs as described in 20 U.S.C. sec. 1087d(c) and amend or promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with subsection (1) of this section to
ensure the list of degrees in low-earning outcome programs remains current; and
(3) Submit an annual report by May 1, 2027, and each May 1 thereafter, to the
Legislative Research Commission for referral to the appropriate interim joint
committee that describes:
(a) The low-earning outcome programs prohibited from receiving public funds;
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/26/2026 8:26 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2078
(b) Measures taken to ensure compliance by the public postsecondary
institutions;
(c) Any known violations of the prohibition;
(d) The amount of public postsecondary institution funds that were withdrawn
or redirected that would previously have been spent on low-earning
outcome program degrees; and
(e) Any student aid or scholarship dollars that were not disbursed to students
who would otherwise have been eligible due to the student's enrollment in a
low-earning outcome program degree.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/26/2026 8:26 AM Jacketed